Utah statutes.
58-49-9.   Use of titles by uncertified person.

No person, without first being certified under this chapter may:

(1)  assume or use the title or designation "dietitian," "dietician," "certified dietitian," the letters "C.D.," the letter "D," or any other title, words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a certified dietitian; or

(2)  represent in any way, whether orally, in writing, in print, or by signature, directly or by implication, that he is a certified dietitian.



Enacted by Chapter 192, 1986 General Session

